Colorado statutes. TITLE 43 Transportation
PART 2 HIGHWAY USERS TAX FUND
43-4-207. County allocation.

After paying the costs of the Colorado state patrol and any other costs of the department, exclusive of highway construction, highway improvements, or highway maintenance, that are appropriated by the general assembly, the money, including money transferred from the general fund to the highway users tax fund pursuant to section 24-75-219 (5)(a)(II) and (5)(b)(II), that section 43-4-205 requires to be paid from the highway users tax fund to the county treasurers of the respective counties shall be paid to the county treasurers of the respective counties, subject to annual appropriation by the general assembly, and shall be allocated and expended as provided in this section. The money received is allocated to the counties as provided by law and shall be expended by the counties only on the construction, engineering, reconstruction, maintenance, repair, equipment, improvement, and administration of the county highway systems and any other public highways, including any state highways, together with acquisition of rights-of-way and access rights for the same, for the planning, designing, engineering, acquisition, installation, construction, repair, reconstruction, maintenance, operation, or administration of transit-related projects, including, but not limited to, designated bicycle or pedestrian lanes of highway and infrastructure needed to integrate different transportation modes within a multimodal transportation system, and for no other purpose; except that money received pursuant to section 43-4-205 (6.3) shall be expended by the counties only for road safety projects, as defined in section 43-4-803 (21). The amount expended for administrative purposes shall not exceed five percent of each county's share of the funds available.

For the fiscal year commencing July 1, 1989, and each fiscal year thereafter, for the purpose of allocating money in the highway users tax fund to the various counties throughout the state, the following method is adopted:

The first sixty-nine million seven hundred thousand dollars or any portion thereof shall be allocated to the counties in such a manner that each county receives the same allocation that it received for the fiscal year 1987-88.

The next seventeen million dollars or any portion thereof shall be allocated to the following seventeen counties in the following percentages: Adams, 9.5718; Alamosa, 1.1598; Arapahoe, 12.6560; Boulder, 7.3571; Douglas, 3.5148; El Paso, 13.0552; Jefferson, 14.9666; La Plata, 2.0733; Larimer, 7.9978; Lincoln, 1.8866; Logan, 2.0334; Mesa, 4.3285; Morgan, 2.9915; Otero, 1.6843; Pueblo, 4.6096; Rio Grande, 1.3384; and Weld, 8.7753.

All money credited to the fund in excess of eighty-six million seven hundred thousand dollars and all money transferred to the fund pursuant to section 24-75-219 (5)(a)(II) and (5)(b)(II) that is required by section 43-4-205 (6.4)(a) and subsection (1) of this section to be paid to the county treasurers of the respective counties is allocated to the counties in the following manner:

Fifteen percent shall be allocated to the counties in proportion to the rural motor vehicle registration in each county. The term "rural motor vehicle registration" includes all passenger, truck, truck-tractor, and motorcycle registrations in unincorporated portions of the county. The number of registrations used in computing the percentage shall be those certified to the state treasurer by the department of revenue as constituting the rural motor vehicle registration for the last preceding year.

Fifteen percent shall be allocated to the counties in proportion to the countywide motor vehicle registration in each county. The term "countywide motor vehicle registration" includes all passenger, truck, truck-tractor, and motorcycle registrations in unincorporated portions of the county and in cities and incorporated towns. The number of registrations used in computing the percentage shall be those certified to the state treasurer by the department of revenue as constituting the countywide motor vehicle registration for the last preceding year.

Sixty percent shall be allocated to counties in proportion to the adjusted lane miles of open, used, and maintained county roads in each county, excepting mileage of state highways and municipal streets. A lane mile shall be measured by each ten-foot width of traveled roadway surface, or fractional lane mile thereof. The adjusted lane miles shall be determined by applying to the existing lane miles of county roads in each county a factor of difficulty. The lane miles, the adjusted lane miles, and the factor representing the difficulty of construction and maintenance in the various counties in the state by reason of terrain shall be determined by the department of transportation as provided in paragraphs (c), (d), and (e) of this subsection (2).

Ten percent shall be allocated to counties in proportion to the square feet of bridge deck for bridges greater than twenty feet in length in each county, as certified by the department of transportation.

The percentage of area in each county classified as "plains", "plains rolling and irrigated", and "mountainous" shall be determined from an accredited topographical map. The department of transportation shall also classify the percentage of "paved" roads in each county. To the percentage indicated "plains" a factor of 1.00 shall be applied. To the percentage indicated "plains rolling and irrigated" a factor of 1.75 shall be applied. To the percentage indicated "mountainous" a factor of 3.00 shall be applied. To the percentage indicated "paved" roads a factor of 1.5 shall be applied.

The department of transportation, prior to July 1 of each year, shall certify to the state treasurer the lane mile figures, as of December 31 of the preceding year, of the several counties, and the state treasurer shall use such lane mile figures for the current fiscal year as the basis for the allocation mentioned in this subsection (2).

The authorized agent, as defined in section 42-1-102, in each county shall certify to the department of revenue the number of motor vehicle licenses issued during the preceding calendar year to persons residing within the limits of a county and whether or not such persons reside in cities, incorporated towns, or unincorporated portions of the county. Upon receipt of the certified information, the department of revenue shall tabulate the total number of all motor vehicle licenses issued during the preceding calendar year to persons residing within the limits of the respective counties in the entire state and within the limits of each city or incorporated town within the respective counties. The department of revenue shall then determine the percentage that the rural motor vehicle registration in each county bears to the total rural motor vehicle registration in the entire state and shall then determine the percentage that the countywide motor vehicle registration in each county bears to the total countywide rural and urban motor vehicle registration in the entire state. On or before May 1 of each year, the department of revenue shall certify to the state treasurer the percentage of motor vehicle registration for each county as provided in this subsection (2)(e).

For the purpose of this section, the city and county of Denver and the city and county of Broomfield shall not be considered as counties.

Source:

L. 53:

p. 503, § 7.

CRS 53:

§ 120-12-7.

L. 59:

p. 646, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 120-12-7.

L. 65:

p. 930, § 6.

L. 71:

p. 1137, § 1.

L. 78:

(2)(b) amended, p. 525, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 79:

(1) amended, p. 1471, § 4, effective July 6; (1) amended, p. 1667, § 142, effective July 19.

L. 87:

(1) amended, p. 1556, § 7, effective July 1.

L. 89:

(2) R&RE, p. 1632, § 1, effective August 1.

L. 89, 1st Ex. Sess.:

(1) amended, p. 66, § 24, effective August 1.

L. 90:

(2)(b)(III) amended, p. 1829, § 3, effective July 1.

L. 91:

(2)(b)(III), (2)(b)(IV), (2)(c), and (2)(d) amended, p. 1126, § 201, effective July 1.

L. 93:

(1) amended, p. 1518, § 22, effective June 6; (1) amended, p. 1799, § 109, effective June 6.

L. 2000:

(2)(b)(I), (2)(b)(II), and (2)(e) amended, p. 1652, § 49, effective June 1.

L. 2001:

(3) amended, p. 273, § 29, effective November 15.

L. 2003:

(1) amended, p. 1703, § 13, effective May 14.

L. 2009:

(1) amended, (SB 09-108), ch. 5, p. 55, § 20, effective March 2.

L. 2013:

(1) amended, (SB 13-048), ch. 138, p. 451, § 3, effective July 1.

L. 2017:

(2)(e) amended, (HB 17-1107), ch. 101, p. 374, § 30, effective August 9.

L. 2018:

(1), IP(2), and IP(2)(b) amended, (SB 18-001), ch. 353, p. 2100, § 7, effective May 31.

Editor's note:

Amendments to subsection (1) by Senate Bill 93-74 and House Bill 93-1342 were harmonized.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in the 2013 act amending subsection (1), see section 1 of chapter 138, Session Laws of Colorado 2013. For the legislative declaration in SB 18-001, see section 1 of chapter 353, Session Laws of Colorado 2018.

43-4-208. Municipal allocation.

After paying the costs of the Colorado state patrol and any other costs of the department, exclusive of highway construction, highway improvements, or highway maintenance, that are appropriated by the general assembly, the money, including money transferred from the general fund to the highway users tax fund pursuant to section 24-75-219 (5)(a)(II) and (5)(b)(II), that section 43-4-205 requires to be paid from the highway users tax fund to cities and incorporated towns shall be paid to the cities and incorporated towns within the limits of the respective counties, subject to annual appropriation by the general assembly, and shall be allocated and expended as provided in this section. Each city treasurer shall account for the money received as provided in this part 2. Money so allocated shall be expended by the cities and incorporated towns for the construction, engineering, reconstruction, maintenance, repair, equipment, improvement, and administration of the system of streets of such city or incorporated town or of any public highways located within such city or incorporated town, including any state highways, together with the acquisition of rights-of-way and access rights for the same, and for the planning, designing, engineering, acquisition, installation, construction, repair, reconstruction, maintenance, operation, or administration of transit-related projects, including, but not limited to, designated bicycle or pedestrian lanes of highway and infrastructure needed to integrate different transportation modes within a multimodal transportation system, and for no other purpose; except that money paid to the cities and incorporated towns pursuant to section 43-4-205 (6.3) shall be expended by the cities and incorporated towns only for road safety projects, as defined in section 43-4-803 (21). The amount expended for administrative purposes shall not exceed five percent of each city's share of the funds available.

For the purpose of allocating money in the highway users tax fund to the various cities and incorporated towns throughout the state, the following method is adopted:

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (6) of this section, eighty percent shall be allocated to the cities and incorporated towns in proportion to the adjusted urban motor vehicle registration in each city and incorporated town. The term "urban motor vehicle registration" includes all passenger, truck, truck-tractor, and motorcycle registrations. The number of registrations used in computing the percentage shall be those certified to the state treasurer by the department of revenue as constituting the urban motor vehicle registration for the last preceding year. The adjusted registration shall be computed by applying a factor to the actual number of such registrations to reflect the increased standards and costs of construction resulting from the concentration of vehicles in cities and incorporated places. For this purpose the following table of actual registration numbers and factors shall be employed:

Twenty percent shall be allocated to the cities and incorporated towns in proportion to the mileage of open, used, and maintained streets in each city and incorporated town, excepting the mileage of state highways.

The department of transportation, prior to July 1 of each year, shall certify to the state treasurer the mileage figures as of December 31 of the preceding year of the several cities and incorporated towns within the state, and the state treasurer shall use such mileage figures for the current fiscal year as the basis for the allocation mentioned.

Repealed.

For the purpose of this section, the city and county of Denver and the city and county of Broomfield shall be considered as cities.

In addition to the provisions of subsection (2)(a) of this section, on or after July 1, 1979, eighty percent of all additional money becoming available to cities and incorporated towns from the highway users tax fund pursuant to sections 24-75-215 and 43-4-205 (6)(b)(III) and, on and after July 1, 2018, eighty percent of the general fund money transferred from the general fund to the highway users tax fund pursuant to section 24-75-219 (5)(a)(II) and (5)(b)(II) that is required by section 43-4-205 (6.4)(b) and subsection (1) of this section to be allocated to the cities and incorporated towns is allocated to the cities and incorporated towns in proportion to the adjusted urban motor vehicle registration in each city and incorporated town. The term "urban motor vehicle registration", as used in this section, includes all passenger, truck, truck-tractor, and motorcycle registrations. The number of registrations used in computing the percentage shall be those certified to the state treasurer by the department of revenue as constituting the urban motor vehicle registration for the last preceding year. The adjusted registration shall be computed by applying a factor to the actual number of such registrations to reflect the increased standards and costs of construction resulting from the concentration of vehicles in cities and incorporated places. For this purpose the following table of actual registration numbers and factors shall be employed:

The share allocated to the city and county of Denver shall be the amount determined by applying the applicable factors set forth in paragraph (a) of this subsection (6) and paragraph (b) of subsection (2) of this section.

Repealed.

Click to view table

Click to view table

Source:

L. 53:

p. 505, § 8.

CRS 53:

§ 120-12-8.

L. 59:

p. 648, § 2.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 120-12-8.

L. 65:

p. 930, § 7.

L. 71:

p. 1137, § 2.

L. 77:

(1) amended, p. 1937, § 1, effective May 26.

L. 79:

(1) amended, p. 1471, § 5, effective July 6; (1) amended and (6) added, p. 1606, §§ 1, 2, effective July 6.

L. 81:

(6)(c) R&RE, p. 1897, § 6, effective June 19.

L. 85:

(6)(c) repealed, p. 1271, § 12, effective May 30.

L. 87:

(1) and (6)(a) amended, p. 1556, § 8, effective July 1.

L. 89, 1st Ex. Sess.:

(1) amended, p. 67, § 25, effective August 1.

L. 91:

(3) amended, p. 1128, § 202, effective July 1.

L. 93:

(1) amended, p. 1518, § 23, effective June 6; (1) amended, p. 1799, § 110, effective June 6.

L. 2000:

(2)(a), (4), and (6)(a) amended, p. 1653, § 50, effective June 1.

L. 2001:

(5) amended, p. 273, § 30, effective November 15.

L. 2003:

(1) amended, p. 1703, § 14, effective May 14.

L. 2009:

(1) amended, (SB 09-108), ch. 5, p. 56, § 21, effective March 2.

L. 2013:

(1) amended, (SB 13-048), ch. 138, p. 451, § 4, effective July 1.

L. 2017:

(4) repealed, (HB 17-1107), ch. 101, p. 375, § 31, effective August 9.

L. 2018:

(1), IP(2), (2)(a), and (6)(a) amended, (SB 18-001), ch. 353, p. 2101, § 8, effective May 31.

43-4-209. Withholding municipal allocations.

Any highway users tax fund money withheld by the state treasurer from allocation to any city or incorporated town, for any reason, shall in no case be withheld for a period to exceed six months from the date that the payment is to be made. After the six-month period has expired and the municipality has failed to correct the reason for withholding, the state treasurer shall pay the withheld funds to the county in which the city or incorporated town from which the funds are withheld is located, which funds shall be spent on the streets of said city or incorporated town.

Source:

L. 53:

p. 507, § 9.

CRS 53:

§ 120-12-9.

L. 55:

p. 750, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 120-12-9.

L. 89, 1st Ex. Sess.:

Entire section amended, p. 63, § 20, effective August 1.

L. 94:

Entire section amended, p. 96, § 2, effective March 18.

43-4-210. Estimated county allocations.

In all cases where the state treasurer is required by law to apportion the moneys in the highway users tax fund to the various counties, if the number of vehicles registered in any of the counties, excluding vehicles registered within the limits of a city or incorporated town within the county, is not available before the state treasurer makes the apportionment provided by law, the state treasurer may estimate the amount to be paid to any county, and may pay to any county a sum not to exceed seventy-five percent of the amount estimated to be due that county, and shall notify the county clerk and recorder in writing that the amount paid is an estimate because registration data is not available.

Source:

L. 53:

p. 507, § 10.

CRS 53:

§ 120-12-10.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 120-12-10.

43-4-211. Estimated municipal allocations.

In all cases where the state treasurer is required by law to apportion the moneys in the highway users tax fund to the various cities and incorporated towns within the state, if the number of vehicles registered in any of the cities or incorporated towns is not available before the state treasurer makes the apportionment provided by law, the state treasurer may estimate the amount to be paid to any such city or incorporated town, and may pay to such city or incorporated town a sum not to exceed seventy-five percent of the amount estimated to be due to such city or incorporated town, and shall notify the clerk of the city or incorporated town that the amount paid is an estimate because registration data is not available.

Source:

L. 53:

p. 507, § 11.

CRS 53:

§ 120-12-11.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 120-12-11.

43-4-212. Payment of balances.

After the state treasurer has made a payment to a county, city, or incorporated town based on his estimate, and the number of vehicles registered in the county, city, or incorporated town is available to the state treasurer, he shall compute the balance due and pay such balance to each of the counties, cities, or incorporated towns to which such payments have been made in the same manner as provided in this part 2.

Source:

L. 53:

p. 508, § 12.

CRS 53:

§ 120-12-12.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 120-12-12.

43-4-213. Forfeiture of funds.

Where any county, city, or incorporated town receiving funds from the state treasurer under the provisions of sections 43-4-210 and 43-4-211 fails to supply the state treasurer with the required information regarding the number of vehicles registered in said county, city, or incorporated town on or before the thirty-first day of December of the year following the year during which said registrations were made, the balance of said funds accruing to the said county, city, or incorporated town shall be deemed to be forfeited by said county, city, or incorporated town, and said funds shall be returned to the credit of the highway users tax fund to be reapportioned during the ensuing year in the manner provided in this part 2.

Source:

L. 53:

p. 508, § 13.

CRS 53:

§ 120-12-13.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 120-12-13.

43-4-214. Future municipalities eligible.

In cases of cities and towns incorporated subsequent to January 1, 1954, said cities and towns are entitled to such proportionate share of the highway users tax fund, subject to the same provisions and limitations as cities and incorporated towns included in the provisions of this part 2 before said date.

Source:

L. 53:

p. 508, § 14.

CRS 53:

§ 120-12-14.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 120-12-14.

43-4-215. Allocation of funds to cities and towns as unincorporated territory - when. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 55:

p. 751, § 1.

CRS 53:

§ 120-12-15.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 120-12-15.

L. 86:

Entire section repealed, p. 1134, § 12, effective July 1.

43-4-216. Liability unaffected.

Nothing in sections 40-4-106 (2), C.R.S., 43-4-201, 43-4-204, 43-4-205, 43-4-206 (1), 43-4-207 (1), and 43-4-208 (1) shall be construed to affect, change, or modify in any way the existing law of this state concerning the responsibility or liability, if any, of the state or any agency thereof, or of any city, town, city and county, county, or other political subdivision of the state, or of any person, firm, or corporation, for any collision, accident, or occurrence at, about, or connected with any crossing of any public highway or road over the tracks of any railroad or street railway corporation.

Source:

L. 65:

p. 931, § 8.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 120-12-16.

43-4-217. Additional funding - road usage fees - rules - legislative declaration - definitions.

The general assembly hereby finds and declares that:

State motor fuel excise taxes levied on the purchase of motor fuels represent the largest source of state funding for the construction, maintenance, and supervision of the highways, roads, and streets of the state;

The amount of motor fuel taxes paid for motor fuel used to propel a motor vehicle bears a reasonable relationship to the vehicle's use of and impact on the highways, roads, and streets of the state because the amount of motor fuel used by a vehicle is in large part a function of the amount of miles traveled by the vehicle and the weight of the vehicle;

Motor fuel tax rates have not been increased in over twenty-five years, and motor fuel tax revenue has not kept pace and will not keep pace with inflation or the increased transportation infrastructure demands of the growing population of the state because:

The amount of motor fuel tax paid does not depend on the price of motor fuel and therefore does not increase when motor fuel prices increase but instead depends on the quantity of motor fuel purchased, which for most drivers does not increase over time; and

Motor vehicles have become more fuel-efficient over time;

It is necessary, appropriate, and in the best interest of the state to mitigate the declining purchasing power of motor fuel excise taxes by collecting a road usage fee from persons who use the transportation system to travel by motor vehicle, basing the amount of the fee on reasonable estimates of fee payers' usage of and impact on the system, and using fee revenue solely for the construction, maintenance, and supervision of the highways of the state;

Because motor fuel consumption is reasonably related to use of and impact on the transportation system, it is fair to fee payers, reasonable, and appropriate to calculate the amount of the road use fee based on their motor fuel consumption;

It is also fair to fee payers, reasonable, and appropriate to streamline fee collection by collecting the road use fee from distributors of motor fuels when motor fuel taxes are collected because the amount of the fee will be incorporated into the retail price of motor fuel and therefore passed on to users of the transportation system in precise proportion to their consumption of motor fuel and in reasonable relation to their use of and impact on the transportation system; and

In accordance with numerous Colorado judicial precedents, the road usage fee and the bridge and tunnel impact fee imposed as authorized by section 43-4-805 (5)(g.5) and collected by the department of revenue on behalf of the statewide bridge and tunnel enterprise pursuant to this section are fees and are not taxes because:

The fees are imposed not to raise revenue for general governmental purposes but instead are imposed for the sole purpose of funding the construction, maintenance, and supervision of the transportation system, with a priority placed on projects that are designated as ten-year vision projects on the department's ten-year vision project list;

Fee revenue defrays costs incurred by the state in funding construction, maintenance, and supervision of the transportation system that is necessitated by increased use of the system by the fee payers who use motor vehicles on the transportation system; and

The fees are imposed at rates that are reasonably calculated to defray the costs of providing the service, are based on the use and impact on the transportation system by fee payers, and are thus proportional to the benefits received by fee payers.

As used in this section:

"Gasoline" means gasoline, as defined in section 39-27-101 (12), that is taxed at the rate specified in section 39-27-102 (1)(a)(II)(A).

"Inflation" means the average annual percentage change in the United States department of transportation, federal highway administration, national highway construction cost index or its applicable predecessor or successor index for the five-year period ending on the last December 31 before a state fiscal year for which an adjustment to the road usage fee imposed pursuant to subsection (3) or (4) of this section is to be made begins.

"Special fuel" means special fuel, as defined in section 39-27-101 (29), that is taxed at the rate specified in section 39-27-102 (1)(a)(II)(B). "Special fuel" does not include diesel fuel and kerosene to which indelible dye meeting federal regulations is added before or upon removal from a terminal so long as such fuel is not used for a taxable purpose as described in section 39-27-102.5 (1.5).

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (6) of this section, on and after April 1, 2023, each distributor of gasoline that pays the excise tax imposed on gasoline shall also pay, at the same time and in the same manner as the excise tax, a road usage fee in the amount specified in subsection (3)(b)(I) of this section or annually calculated by the department of revenue as required by subsection (3)(b)(II) or (3)(b)(III) of this section.

The amount of the road usage fee for each gallon of gasoline acquired, sold, offered for sale, or used in this state from April 1, 2023, through June 30, 2023, and during state fiscal years 2023-24 through 2031-32 is:

Two cents per gallon from April 1, 2023, through June 30, 2023;

Three cents per gallon for state fiscal year 2023-24;

Four cents per gallon for state fiscal year 2024-25;

Five cents per gallon for state fiscal year 2025-26;

Six cents per gallon for state fiscal year 2026-27;

Seven cents per gallon for state fiscal year 2027-28; and

Eight cents per gallon for state fiscal years 2028-29 through 2031-32.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (3)(b)(III) of this section, the amount of the road usage fee for each gallon of gasoline acquired, sold, offered for sale, or used in this state during state fiscal year 2032-33 or during any subsequent state fiscal year is the sum of:

The nominal amount of eight cents on December 31, 2030, adjusted for inflation; and

The difference between the nominal amount of twenty-two cents on December 31, 2030, adjusted for inflation, and the nominal amount of twenty-two cents on December 31, 2030.

An adjustment for inflation shall be made pursuant to subsection (3)(b)(II) of this section only if the rate of inflation is positive and must be the lesser of the actual rate of inflation or five percent. The department of revenue shall calculate the inflation adjusted amount of the road usage fee for state fiscal year 2032-33 and shall publish the amount no later than April 15, 2032.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (6) of this section, on and after April 1, 2023, each distributor of special fuel that pays the excise tax imposed on special fuel shall also pay, at the same time and in the same manner as the excise tax, a road usage fee in the amount specified in subsection (4)(b)(I) of this section or annually calculated by the department of revenue as required by subsection (4)(b)(II) or (4)(b)(III) of this section.

The amount of the road usage fee for each gallon of special fuel acquired, sold, offered for sale, or used in this state from April 1, 2023, through June 30, 2023, and during state fiscal years 2023-24 through 2031-32 is:

Two cents per gallon from April 1, 2023, through June 30, 2023;

Three cents per gallon for state fiscal year 2023-24;

Four cents per gallon for state fiscal year 2024-25;

Five cents per gallon for state fiscal year 2025-26;

Six cents per gallon for state fiscal year 2026-27;

Seven cents per gallon for state fiscal year 2027-28; and

Eight cents per gallon for state fiscal years 2028-29 through 2031-32.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (4)(b)(III) of this section, the amount of the road usage fee for each gallon of special fuel acquired, sold, offered for sale, or used in this state during state fiscal year 2032-33 or during any subsequent state fiscal year is the sum of:

The nominal amount of eight cents on December 31, 2030, adjusted for inflation; and

The difference between the nominal amount of twenty and one-half cents on December 31, 2030, adjusted for inflation, and the nominal amount of twenty and one-half cents on December 31, 2030.

An adjustment for inflation shall be made pursuant to subsection (4)(b)(II) of this section only if the rate of inflation is positive and must be the lesser of the actual rate of inflation or five percent. The department of revenue shall calculate the inflation adjusted amount of the road usage fee for state fiscal year 2032-33 and shall publish the amount no later than April 15, 2032.

Each distributor of special fuel that pays the excise tax imposed on special fuel shall also pay, at the same time and in the same manner as the excise tax and the road usage fee imposed pursuant to subsections (3) and (4) of this section, a bridge and tunnel impact fee in the amount imposed by the statewide bridge and tunnel enterprise as authorized by section 43-4-805 (5)(g.5). The collection and administration of the bridge and tunnel impact fee by the department of revenue on behalf of the statewide bridge and tunnel enterprise is done on behalf of the enterprise for the purpose of minimizing compliance costs for distributors and administrative costs for the state, and all bridge and tunnel impact fee revenue is revenue of the enterprise only and is excluded from state fiscal year spending, as defined in section 24-77-102 (17).

A distributor is not required to pay the road usage fee imposed by subsection (3) or (4) of this section or the bridge and tunnel impact fee imposed as authorized by section 43-4-805 (5)(g.5), if the distributor would otherwise be liable for the excise tax on the gasoline or special fuel subject to the fee but is allowed to sell the gasoline or special fuel without payment of the applicable excise tax pursuant to section 39-27-102 (1)(b)(II) or section 39-27-102.5 (2)(b).

Gasoline or special fuel removed from a terminal in this state by a person licensed as an exporter pursuant to section 39-27-104 exclusively for delivery to another state is not subject to the road usage fee imposed by subsection (3) or (4) of this section or the bridge and tunnel impact fee imposed as authorized by section 43-4-805 (5)(g.5).

The burden of proving that gasoline or special fuel is not subject to the road usage fee imposed by subsection (3) or (4) of this section or the bridge and tunnel impact fee imposed as authorized by section 43-4-805 (5)(g.5) is on the distributor under such reasonable requirements of proof as the executive director of the department of revenue may prescribe.

The collection, administration, and enforcement of the road usage fees imposed by subsection (3) or (4) of this section and the bridge and tunnel impact fee imposed as authorized by section 43-4-805 (5)(g.5) shall be performed by the executive director of the department of revenue in the same manner as the collection, administration, and enforcement of state gasoline and special fuel taxes pursuant to article 27 of title 39. A distributor who pays the road usage fee as required by subsection (3) or (4) of this section shall remit the fee, together with any bridge and tunnel impact fee that the distributor also pays as required by section 43-4-805 (5)(g.5) and subsection (5) of this section, to the department of revenue at the same time and in the same manner in which the distributor remits gasoline or special fuel taxes collected by the distributor as required by article 27 of title 39. The department of revenue may promulgate rules to implement this section.

In accordance with section 43-4-203 (1)(f), the state treasurer shall credit all road usage fee revenue collected as required by this section to the highway users tax fund created in section 43-4-201. In accordance with section 43-4-805 (5)(g.5), the state treasurer shall credit all bridge and tunnel impact fee revenue collected as required by this section to the statewide bridge and tunnel enterprise special revenue fund created in section 43-4-805 (3)(a). All fees credited to the highway users tax fund pursuant to this section shall be allocated from the highway users tax fund to the state, counties, and municipalities as required by section 43-4-205 (6.8).

Source:

L. 2021:

Entire section added, (SB 21-260), ch. 250, p. 1419, § 35, effective June 17.

L. 2022:

(3)(a), IP(3)(b)(I), (3)(b)(I)(A), (4)(a), IP(4)(b)(I), and (4)(b)(I)(A) amended, (HB 22-1351), ch. 159, p. 1004, § 4, effective May 16.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in SB 21-260, see section 1 of chapter 250, Session Laws of Colorado 2021. For the legislative declaration in HB 22-1351, see section 1 of chapter 159, Session Laws of Colorado 2022.